Utah statutes.
70D-2-104.   Ordinance or law by political subdivision prohibited.
(1)  A county subject to Title 17, Counties, and a municipality subject to
Title 10, Utah Municipal Code, may not enact an ordinance or law that:
(a)  regulates a term of a mortgage loan on a dwelling; or
(b)  makes the eligibility of a person to do business with the county or
municipality dependent upon a term of a mortgage loan on a dwelling originated
or serviced by the person.
(2)  Subsection (1) does not apply to a term or loan funded in whole or in
part with money provided or administered by the county or municipality.
